Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 1. Legal Holidays.

Sec. 44.12.010.
Legal holidays.

The following days are legal holidays:

the first of January, known as New Year’s Day;

the third Monday of January, known as Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday as provided in (b) of this section;

the third Monday in February, known as Presidents’ Day;

the last Monday of March, known as Seward’s Day;

the last Monday in May, known as Memorial Day;

the fourth of July, known as Independence Day;

the first Monday in September, known as Labor Day;

the 18th of October, known as Alaska Day;

the 11th of November, known as Veterans’ Day;

the fourth Thursday in November, known as Thanksgiving Day;

the 25th of December, known as Christmas Day;

every Sunday;

every day designated by public proclamation by the President of the United States or the governor of the state as a legal holiday.

For employment purposes, Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday is a legal holiday for state employees who

are not covered by a collective bargaining agreement; or

are covered by a collective bargaining agreement whose terms

include by name Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday; or

have been amended to substitute a holiday on the third Monday of January for Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday in place of another paid holiday.

History.

(§ 1-1-6 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 183 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 109 SLA 1989)

Sec. 44.12.020.
Holiday falling on Sunday.

If a holiday listed in AS

44.12.010

, except AS

44.12.010

(a)(12), falls on a Sunday, Sunday and the following Monday are both legal holidays.

History.

(§ 1-1-6 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 183 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1969)

Sec. 44.12.025.
Holiday falling on Saturday.

If a holiday listed in AS

44.12.010

falls on a Saturday, the Saturday and the preceding Friday are both legal holidays for officers and employees of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1966)